Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB48.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 158 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:
(a) "Community eligibility provision" means the school meal reimbursement
program administered by the United States Department of Agriculture to
reimburse low-income schools for offering free meals to all enrolled
students governed by 7 C.F.R. pt. 245;
(b) "Identified student percentage" means the percentage of student population
used by the United States Department of Agriculture to determine the
eligibility and reimbursement rate of a school, group of schools, or school
district for the community eligibility provision; and
(c) "Paid rate" means the partial reimbursement rate a school participating in
the community eligibility provision receives for providing a no-charge
school breakfast or lunch that is not eligible for reimbursement at the free
rate through the community eligibility provision.
(2) There is hereby created a restricted fund to be known as Kentucky Proud School
Match Program fund. The fund shall be administered by the Kentucky
Department of Education. Moneys in the fund shall be used by the department to
reimburse school districts that participate in the Kentucky Proud School Match
Program in accordance with subsection (3) of this section. The fund shall contain
moneys received from the general fund, federal funds, and any other proceeds
from contributions, gifts, or grants made available for the purposes of the fund.
Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any moneys remaining in the fund at the close of
the fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward into the succeeding
fiscal year to be used by the department for the purposes set forth in this section.
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 12/30/2024 2:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 156
(3) The Kentucky Proud School Match Program is hereby established to reduce the
financial burden of eligible school districts participating in the community
eligibility provision. Subject to the availability of funds, the Kentucky Department
of Education shall reimburse an eligible school district thirty-three cents ($0.33)
from the Kentucky Proud School Match Program fund for each meal that is:
(a) Reimbursed by the United States Department of Agriculture through the
community eligibility provision at the paid rate; and
(b) Provided by a school participating in the community eligibility provision
that qualifies individually, as part of a group of schools, or as part of a
district with an identified student percentage of at least forty percent (40%).
(4) A school district with at least one (1) school or group of schools participating in
the community eligibility provision shall be eligible to participate in the Kentucky
Proud School Match Program upon development and implementation of a
Kentucky Proud school plan to:
(a) Identify and purchase available Kentucky-grown agricultural products that
meet the applicable quality standards and pricing requirements of the
school district. The plan may prioritize the purchase of Kentucky Proud
agricultural products; and
(b) Optimize food usage in the district's school nutrition programs in order to
reduce food waste in the district. Districts are encouraged to incorporate the
use of a share table program in the Kentucky Proud school plan.
(5) The Kentucky Board of Education shall promulgate administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A necessary to carry out this section, including
an application form for the Kentucky Proud School Match Program, a sample
Kentucky Proud school plan, and method of data collection to measure the
impact of the Kentucky Proud School Match Program.
(6) In the event that the United States Department of Agriculture terminates the
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 12/30/2024 2:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 156
community eligibility provision, the provisions of this section shall be considered
null and void.
Section 2. This Act may be cited as the Kentucky Proud School Match Act.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 12/30/2024 2:13 PM Jacketed